Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE A. HIGHER EDUCATION IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 55. FINANCING PERMANENT IMPROVEMENTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 55.01. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" has the meaning assigned to it by Section 61.003(7) of this code, except that "public junior college" is excluded.

(2) "Governing board" or "board" means the board having management and control of an institution of higher education.

(3) "Revenue funds" means the revenues, incomes, receipts, rentals, rates, charges, fees, grants, and tuition levied or collected from any public or private source by an institution of higher education, including interest or other income from those funds.

(4) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, or credit agreements a board is authorized to enter into either by this title or by other laws.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1073, Sec. 1.04, eff. Aug. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.02. SYSTEMWIDE REVENUE FINANCING PROGRAM. (a) The governing board of a university system may establish a systemwide revenue financing program to provide funds to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure at an institution, branch, or entity of the university system.

(b) The governing board may issue bonds or notes in accordance with this chapter for any purpose authorized by law as part of the systemwide revenue financing program.

(c) The governing board may pledge to the payment of any bonds or notes issued as part of the systemwide revenue financing program all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the university system.

(d) In this section, "university system" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003 of this code.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.03. MINORITY-OWNED AND WOMEN-OWNED BUSINESSES. (a) The board of regents of each institution of higher education shall make a good-faith effort to award to minority-owned and women-owned businesses:

(1) contracts relating to the issuance of bonds by the board under this chapter in the amount of at least 25 percent of the total costs of issuing those bonds; and

(2) contracts for the items to be financed by bonds issued by the board in the amount of at least 25 percent of the proceeds of those bonds.

(b) Not later than October 31 of each academic year, the board of regents shall file with the governor and each house of the legislature a written report containing the following information for the previous academic year for all businesses, minority-owned businesses and women-owned businesses, classified by gender and minority group status:

(1) the total number of contracts relating to the issuance of bonds by the board under this chapter and to the items to be financed by those bonds;

(2) the total dollar amount the board of regents must pay under each contract described by Subdivision (1) of this subsection; and

(3) the total number of businesses submitting bids or proposals relating to the issuance of bonds by the board under this chapter and to the items to be financed by those bonds.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Minority-owned business" means a business entity at least 51 percent of which is owned by members of a minority group or, in the case of a corporation, at least 51 percent of the shares of which are owned by members of a minority group, and that is managed and controlled by members of a minority group in its daily operations.

(2) "Minority group" includes:

(A) African Americans;

(B) American Indians;

(C) Asian Americans; and

(D) Mexican Americans and other Americans of Hispanic origin.

(3) "Women-owned business" means a business entity at least 51 percent of which is owned by women or, in the case of a corporation, at least 51 percent of the shares of which are owned by women, and that is managed and controlled by women in its daily operations.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.04. CUMULATIVE EFFECT. (a) The authority to issue bonds under this chapter is cumulative of all other authority to issue bonds. The governing board of an institution of higher education may issue bonds under that other authority or may issue bonds under the authority of this chapter.

(b) This chapter is sufficient authority for a governing board of an institution of higher education to issue bonds under this chapter and to perform all other acts and procedures authorized by this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER B. REVENUE BONDS AND FACILITIES

Sec. 55.11. GENERAL AUTHORITY. Each board is authorized to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, equip, operate, and/or maintain any property, buildings, structures, activities, services, operations, or other facilities, for and on behalf of its institution or institutions, or any branch or branches thereof.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.111. CERTAIN ALLOCATED FUNDS TO BE DESIGNATED AS CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE PROJECTS. For purposes of this subchapter, funds allocated from the appropriation of general revenue or federal funds to an institution of higher education to supplement revenue funds of the institution described by Section 55.13(a) may be designated as "Capital Construction Assistance Projects."

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 1, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.115. HIGH-PERFORMANCE, SUSTAINABLE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND RENOVATION STANDARDS FOR CERTAIN FACILITIES. (a) This section applies to the construction of an institution of higher education building, structure, or other facility, or the renovation of a building, structure, or other facility the cost of which is more than $2 million, or, if less than $2 million, more than 50 percent of the value of the building, structure, or other facility, if any part of the construction or renovation is financed by revenue bonds issued under this subchapter.

(b) A building, structure, or other facility to which this section applies must be designed and constructed or renovated so that the building, structure, or other facility complies with high-performance building standards, approved by the board of regents of the institution, that provide minimum requirements for energy use, natural resources use, and indoor air quality. In approving high-performance building standards, a board of regents shall consider, but is not subject to, the high-performance building evaluation system approved by the state energy conservation office under Section 447.004, Government Code, and may solicit and consider recommendations from the advisory committee appointed under that section.

(c) Except as provided by this section, a building, structure, or other facility to which this section applies must be designed and constructed or renovated to comply with the applicable energy and water conservation design standards established by the state energy conservation office under Section 447.004, Government Code, unless the institution constructing the building determines that compliance with those standards is impractical and notifies the state energy conservation office of the determination and provides to the office documentation supporting the determination.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 51), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 55.12. CONTRACTS FOR JOINT CONSTRUCTION. Each board may enter into contracts with municipalities or school districts for the joint construction of museums, libraries, or other buildings.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.13. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS. (a) For the purpose of providing funds to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and/or equip any property, buildings, structures, activities, services, operations, or other facilities, for and on behalf of its institution or institutions, or any branch or branches thereof, each board may issue its revenue bonds from time to time and in one or more issue or series, to be payable from and secured by liens on and pledges of all or any part of any of the revenue funds of the board and its institution or institutions, or any branch or branches of any of its institutions.

(b) With respect to all institutions the Texas Public Finance Authority shall exercise the authority of a board to issue revenue bonds on behalf of such institution or institutions, or any branch or branches thereof, in the manner provided by this subchapter, including the authority to issue refunding bonds under Section 55.19 of this code. In connection with the issuance of bonds under this chapter, the Texas Public Finance Authority has all of the rights and duties granted or assigned to and is subject to the same conditions as a board under this chapter. This subsection does not apply to The University of Texas System, The Texas A&M University System, or a component of those systems to an institution authorized to issue bonds under Article VII, Section 17, of the Texas Constitution, or to bonds authorized to be issued by any of those systems, components, or institutions.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, with respect to all bonds authorized to be issued by Texas Southern University, the Texas Public Finance Authority shall exercise the authority of a board to issue bonds on behalf of that university, in the manner provided by this subchapter, including the authority to issue refunding bonds under Section 55.19. In connection with the issuance of bonds under this chapter, the Texas Public Finance Authority has all the rights and duties granted or assigned to and is subject to the same conditions as a board under this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 14.01, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 294, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1073, Sec. 2.01, eff. Aug. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 521 (H.B. 2251), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 417 (H.B. 1522), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 55.14. TERMS AND CONDITIONS. (a) The bonds may be issued to mature serially or otherwise within not to exceed 50 years from their date, and each board may provide for the subsequent issuance of additional parity bonds, or subordinate lien bonds, under any terms or conditions that may be set forth in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(b) The bonds, and any interest coupons appertaining thereto, are and shall constitute negotiable instruments within the meaning and for all purposes of the Texas Uniform Commercial Code (provided that the bonds may be issued registrable as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest), and shall be executed, and may be made redeemable prior to maturity, and may be issued in such form, denominations, and manner, and under such terms, conditions, and details, and may be sold in such manner, at such price, and under such terms, and said bonds shall bear interest at such rates, all as shall be determined and provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.15. DISPOSITION OF BOND PROCEEDS. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds may be used for paying interest on the bonds during the period of the acquisition or construction of any facilities to be provided through the issuance of the bonds, and for providing a reserve for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds, and such proceeds may be placed on time deposit or invested, until needed, to the extent, and in the manner provided, in the bond resolution.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.16. BOARD RESPONSIBILITY. (a) Each board shall be authorized to fix and collect rentals, rates, and charges from students and others for the occupancy, services, use, and/or availability of all or any of its property, buildings, structures, activities, operations, or other facilities as provided by this section.

Text of subsec. (b) as amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 13

(b) Unless it is expressly provided by law that specified funds under the control of a board are not considered revenue funds, a provision in this title or another law that limits the purpose for which funds under the control of the board may be spent does not impair a board's ability to pledge and use all revenue funds under the board's control to secure and pay obligations of the board under this chapter or other law.

Text of subsec. (b) as amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 2

(b) Unless expressly provided by law that specified money under the control of a board is not considered revenue funds, a provision of this title or another law that limits the purposes for which money under the control of the board may be spent does not impair the board's authority to pledge and use any revenue or money under the board's control to secure or pay obligations of the board under this chapter or other law.

Text of subsec. (c) as amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 13

(c) A board shall fix each rental, rate, charge, or fee that the board has authority under this title to fix in an amount determined to be necessary to pay or provide, for each activity or service, all associated capital costs, including debt service, operation and maintenance costs, including associated overhead costs of a system or institution, and prudent reserves. Except as otherwise provided by Subsection (e), this section does not authorize a board to impose a rental, rate, charge, or fee at an amount exceeding a limit imposed by another provision of this title.

Text of subsec. (c) as amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 2

(c) A board shall fix each rental, rate, charge, or fee that the board is authorized by this title to fix in an amount the board determines necessary to pay or provide, for each activity or service for which the rental, rate, charge, or fee is imposed, all associated capital costs, including debt service, operation and maintenance costs, including associated overhead costs of a system or institution, and prudent reserves. Except as otherwise provided by Subsection (e), this section does not authorize a board to impose a rental, rate, charge, or fee in an amount that exceeds any applicable limit imposed by another provision of this title.

Text of subsec. (d) as amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 13

(d) For billing and reporting purposes, a board shall accumulate all mandatory fees or charges provided for by this section or Chapter 54 as a separate facilities and services charge.

Text of subsec. (d) as amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 2

(d) For billing and reporting purposes, a governing board may accumulate all mandatory fees or charges authorized by this section or by Chapter 54 as a separate facilities and services charge.

(e) If bonds have been or are issued pursuant to this title, or secured or to be secured by a pledge of part or all of the board's revenue funds, and if, at the time of authorizing the issuance of the bonds, (1) the estimated maximum amount per semester hour of such pledged revenue funds (based on then current enrollment and conditions) during any future semester necessary to provide for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds when due, together with (2) the aggregate amount of all such pledged revenue funds which were levied on a semester hour basis for the then current semester to pay the principal of and interest on all previously issued bonds, do not exceed the amount permitted by this title, then any necessary fees, tuition, rentals, rates, or other charges constituting revenue funds shall be levied and collected when and to the extent required by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds in any amount required to provide revenue funds sufficient for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds, regardless of any other provision or limitation provided by this title.

(f) A board is not required to charge students enrolled in different degree programs at the institution the same rentals, rates, charges, and fees under this section.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1759, ch. 641, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1973; Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1245, ch. 469, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1975; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 716, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 839, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 327, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 757, Sec. 7, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1073, Sec. 1.05, eff. Aug. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 55.165. OVERSIGHT OF CERTAIN CAPITAL PROJECTS. (a) This section applies only to a capital project for which the issuance of bonds is specifically authorized under this chapter on or after October 1, 2021.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2262.002(a), Government Code, or any other law, a project to which this section applies is subject to oversight by the contract advisory team in accordance with Subchapter C, Chapter 2262, Government Code, and the governing board of the institution of higher education or university system for which a project was authorized shall consult the contract advisory team before expending any funds for purposes of the project. The contract advisory team shall consider the model guidelines for procurement and construction developed by the capital project oversight advisory commission established by S.B. 52, 87th Legislature, 3rd Called Session, 2021, when consulting with a governing board for purposes of this subsection.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 322.020(f), Government Code, or any other law, the governing board of an institution of higher education or university system authorized to issue bonds for a project to which this section applies shall report any major contract as defined by Section 322.020(a), Government Code, that is entered into for purposes of the project to the major contracts database maintained by the Legislative Budget Board under Section 322.020, Government Code, not later than the 30th day after the date the contract is executed.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 3, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.17. PLEDGES; PARIETAL RULES; TYPES OF FEES; ADDITIONAL PLEDGE OF RESOURCES; ACQUISITION, ETC. OF PROPERTY; REVENUE BONDS. (a) Each board may pledge all or any part of its revenue funds to the payment of the bonds, including the payment of principal, interest, and any other amounts required or permitted in connection with the bonds. The pledged revenue funds shall be fixed and collected in amounts that will be at least sufficient to provide for all payments of principal, interest, and any other amounts required in connection with the bonds and, to the extent required by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, to provide for the payment of expenses in connection with the bonds and for the payment of operation, maintenance, and other expenses in connection with the aforesaid property, buildings, structures, activities, services, operations, or other facilities.

(b) Each board may establish and enforce parietal rules for students and others, and enter into agreements regarding occupancy, use, and availability of facilities, and the amounts and collection of pledged revenue funds that will assure making all the required payments and deposits.

(c) Tuition, rentals, rates, and other charges of an institution of higher education authorized by this title may be pledged to the payment of the bonds and shall be fixed and collected from all or any designated part of the students enrolled in the institution or institutions, or any branch or branches thereof, in the amounts and in the manner as determined and provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds; and said tuition, rentals, rates, and other charges may be collected in the full amounts required or permitted herein, without regard to actual use, availability, or existence of any facility, commencing at any time designated by the board. Such tuition, rentals, rates, and other charges may be fixed and collected, and pledged to the payment of any issue or series of bonds issued by the board, in the full amounts required or permitted herein, in addition to, and regardless of the existence of, any other specific or general fees at the institution or institutions, or any branch or branches thereof; provided that each board may restrict its power to pledge such additional tuition, rentals, rates, or other charges in any manner that may be provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, and provided that no such additional tuition, rentals, rates, or other charges shall be pledged if prohibited by any resolution which authorized the issuance of any then outstanding bonds.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1073, Sec. 1.06, eff. Aug. 1, 1997.

(e)(1) The board of regents of Texas Tech University, acting separately and independently for and on behalf of Texas Tech University and separately and independently for and on behalf of the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, is hereby granted full and final authority and responsibility to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for Texas Tech University and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center.

(2) The board of regents of Texas Tech University, acting separately and independently for and on behalf of Texas Tech University and separately and independently for and on behalf of the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, may pledge irrevocably to the payment of its revenue bonds all or any part of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at Texas Tech University and/or at the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center; and the amount of any pledge so made shall never be reduced or abrogated while such bonds are outstanding; provided, however, that such tuition charges shall not be pledged pursuant to the authority granted by this Subsection (e)(2) except to the payment of bonds issued in an aggregate principal amount of not to exceed $35 million for the purpose of providing funds to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center.

(3) In addition to the authority granted by Sections 55.13, 55.14, 55.17, and 55.19 of this code, the board of regents of Texas Tech University and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center may issue bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in an additional aggregate principal amount not to exceed $25 million to finance the items listed under Subdivision (1) of this subsection. The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Tech University or Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at Texas Tech University or at the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center. The amount of a pledge made under this subdivision may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(4) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Tech University and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center may issue bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board to finance the items listed under Subdivision (1) of this subsection in an additional aggregate principal amount for Texas Tech University not to exceed $30 million, and in an additional aggregate principal amount for the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center not to exceed $32.5 million. The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Tech University or the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at Texas Tech University or at the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center. The amount of a pledge made under this subdivision may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding. Of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this subdivision for the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, $2.5 million may be used only to build and equip a surgical and medical facility in the Midland County Hospital District for a cardiology residency program.

(f)(1) The board of regents of The University of Texas System is hereby granted full and final authority and responsibility to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and/or equip property, buildings, structures, and/or facilities for The University of Texas at Dallas, The University of Texas of the Permian Basin, The University of Texas at San Antonio, The University of Texas Medical School at Houston, The University of Texas Dental School at San Antonio, The University of Texas (Undergraduate) Nursing School at El Paso, and The University of Texas (Clinical) Nursing School at San Antonio.

(2) The board of regents of The University of Texas System may pledge irrevocably to the payment of its revenue bonds all or any part of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at each and every institution, branch, and school operated by or under the jurisdiction of said board of regents of The University of Texas System; and the amount of any pledge so made shall never be reduced or abrogated while such bonds are outstanding; provided, however, that such tuition charges shall not be pledged pursuant to the authority granted by this Subsection (f)(2) except to the payment of bonds issued in an aggregate principal amount of not to exceed $150 million for the purpose of providing funds to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and/or equip property, buildings, structures, and facilities for The University of Texas at Dallas, The University of Texas of the Permian Basin, The University of Texas at San Antonio, The University of Texas Medical School at Houston, The University of Texas Dental School at San Antonio, The University of Texas (Undergraduate) Nursing School at El Paso, and The University of Texas (Clinical) Nursing School at San Antonio.

(g) The board of regents of The University of Texas System, The Texas A&M University System, or Texas Tech University may not issue bonds under this section pursuant to its systemwide revenue financing program for the benefit of an institution under its governance unless the board determines before issuing the bonds that the institution is reasonably expected to have the financial resources necessary to meet its obligations with respect to the bonds without using the resources of any other institution under the governance of the board. This subsection does not decrease the authority of a board of regents to enter into pledges or covenants with respect to bonds, notes, or other obligations under law existing before the effective date of this subsection.

(h) Subsections (a) through (g) of this section are cumulative of all other laws on the subject, but they shall be wholly sufficient authority for the issuance of the bonds and the performance of the acts and procedures, and the exercise of the powers granted and authorized thereby, regardless of any restrictions or limitations contained in any other laws; and when any bonds are being issued or any acts or procedures are being undertaken, or any powers being exercised pursuant to those subsections, then to the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between any provisions of those subsections, and any provision of any other law, the provisions of those subsections shall prevail and control.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3335, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 757, Sec. 8, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1073, Sec. 1.06, 2.02, eff. Aug. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.171. SPECIFIC INSTITUTIONS. (a) The board of regents of the University of Houston may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and equip property, buildings, structures, and facilities for the University of Houston at Clear Lake City, and for these purposes may request the Texas Public Finance Authority to issue revenue bonds on behalf of the University of Houston pursuant to this subchapter. The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of these revenue bonds all or any part of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at the University of Houston or the University of Houston at Clear Lake City, or both; and the amount of any pledge so made shall never be reduced or abrogated while the bonds are outstanding. However, the tuition charges shall not be pledged pursuant to the authority granted by this subsection except to the payment of bonds issued in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $40 million for the purpose of providing funds to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and equip property, buildings, structures, and facilities for the University of Houston at Clear Lake City.

(b) The board of directors of the Texas A & M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and equip property, buildings, structures, and facilities for Texas A & M University at Galveston, and for these purposes may issue revenue bonds pursuant to this subchapter. The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of these revenue bonds all or any part of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at Texas A & M University and Texas A & M University at Galveston; and the amount of any pledge so made shall never be reduced or abrogated while the bonds are outstanding. However, the tuition charges shall not be pledged pursuant to the authority granted by this subsection except to the payment of bonds issued in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $7.5 million for the purpose of providing funds to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and equip property, buildings, structures, and facilities for Texas A & M University at Galveston.

(c) Tuition revenue of Prairie View A & M College and Tarleton State College is specifically exempted from being pledged under the provisions of this bill.

(d) It is provided, however, that no bonds shall be issued hereunder and no tuition shall be pledged thereto unless and until the specific terms and provisions of said bonds and pledge have been first approved by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System, in accordance with rules and regulations regarding that subject adopted, published and heard in accordance with Section 61.027 of this code.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 345, ch. 145, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1973. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3052, ch. 799, Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 1981; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 14.02, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Sec. 55.1711. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY--CORPUS CHRISTI. (a) The board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and equip property, buildings, structures, and facilities for Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi, including a classroom, a laboratory, and an office facility; a central heating and air conditioning plant; roads, sidewalks, landscaping, and related infrastructure; and a physical education instructional facility. The board may finance said facilities through the issuance of bonds pursuant to this subchapter and in accordance with its existing system-wide revenue financing program and may pledge irrevocably to the payment of such bonds all or any part of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi; and the amount of any pledge so made shall never be reduced or abrogated while such bonds, or bonds issued to refund such bonds, are outstanding. Bonds issued pursuant to this subsection may not be issued in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $30 million.

(b) The bonds issued hereunder and the facilities financed thereby shall be subject to all approvals then required by law.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 438, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1991. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 126, Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 1997.

Sec. 55.1712. TEXAS A&M INTERNATIONAL UNIVERSITY. (a) The board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, enlarge, and equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, and related infrastructure for Texas A&M International University.

(b) The board may finance those items listed under Subsection (a) of this section through the issuance of bonds under this subchapter and in accordance with its existing system-wide revenue financing program. The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at Texas A&M International University. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) Bonds issued under this section may not be issued in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $30 million.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 14.03, eff. Jan. 1, 1992. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.1713. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the authority granted by Sections 55.13, 55.14, 55.17, 55.171, 55.1711, 55.1712, and 55.19 of this code, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the following institutions to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the following amounts:

(1) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi, $22 million;

(2) Texas A&M International University, $36 million; and

(3) Texas A&M University--Kingsville, $17 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its constitutional and statutory duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.1714. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the authority granted by Sections 55.13, 55.14, 55.17, 55.172, and 55.19 of this code, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the following institutions to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with its systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the following amounts:

(1) The University of Texas at Brownsville, $23.5 million;

(2) The University of Texas at El Paso, $23 million;

(3) The University of Texas--Pan American, $26 million;

(4) The University of Texas at San Antonio, $63.5 million;

(5) The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio, $25 million; and

(6) The University of Texas at Austin, $2 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) Of the proceeds of bonds issued under this section for The University of Texas at San Antonio, $20 million may be used only to acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip a downtown campus for that university. Proceeds of bonds issued under this section for The University of Texas at Austin may be used only to acquire, purchase, construct, renovate, enlarge, or equip the McDonald Observatory.

(d) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its constitutional and statutory duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.1715. THE UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the authority granted by Sections 55.13, 55.14, 55.17, 55.171, and 55.19 of this code, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the University of Houston--Downtown to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $22.4 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of Houston System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.1716. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the authority granted by Sections 55.13, 55.14, 55.17, and 55.19 of this code, the board of regents of the Texas State University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for an institution, branch, or entity of the system to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in the aggregate principal amount of $27 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.1717. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS AND TEXAS COLLEGE OF OSTEOPATHIC MEDICINE. (a) The board of regents of the University of North Texas may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the University of North Texas or the Texas College of Osteopathic Medicine to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in the aggregate principal amounts not to exceed $25 million for the University of North Texas and $10 million for the Texas College of Osteopathic Medicine.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of the University of North Texas or the Texas College of Osteopathic Medicine, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at the University of North Texas or the Texas College of Osteopathic Medicine. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds between the University of North Texas and the Texas College of Osteopathic Medicine to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for the University of North Texas and the Texas College of Osteopathic Medicine to carry out their duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 55.1718. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) The board of regents of the Texas Woman's University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for a component institution of the system to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in the aggregate principal amount of $5 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of the Texas Woman's University System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at a component institution of the system. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 803, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 26, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 55.172. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS--PAN AMERICAN. (a) The board of regents of The University of Texas System may construct and equip academic buildings, structures, and facilities for The University of Texas--Pan American, following approval for such construction by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and for these purposes may issue revenue bonds pursuant to this subchapter. The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of these revenue bonds all or any part of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at The University of Texas--Pan American; and the amount of any pledge so made shall never be reduced or abrogated while the bonds are outstanding. However, the tuition charges shall not be pledged pursuant to the authority granted by this subsection except to the payment of bonds issued in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $10 million for the purpose of providing funds to construct and equip academic buildings, structures, and facilities for The University of Texas--Pan American.

(b) It is provided, however, that no bonds shall be issued hereunder and no tuition shall be pledged thereto unless and until the specific terms and provisions of said bonds and pledge have been first approved by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in accordance with rules and regulations regarding that subject adopted, published, and heard in accordance with Section 61.027 of this code.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 488, ch. 212, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1973. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 181, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 55.1721. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the following institutions to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the following amounts:

(1) Prairie View A&M University, $15 million;

(2) Tarleton State University, $15 million;

(3) Texas A&M University, $12.5 million;

(4) Texas A&M University Health Science Center, $6 million;

(5) Texas A&M University--Commerce, $4.2 million;

(6) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi, $25 million;

(7) Texas A&M International University, $39.5 million;

(8) Texas A&M University--Kingsville, $15 million;

(9) Texas A&M University--Texarkana, $4 million; and

(10) West Texas A&M University, $9 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its constitutional and statutory duties and purposes.

(d) Of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for Texas A&M International University, $4.5 million may be used only to purchase library books, journals, and other library materials, equipment, and furniture for the university's library.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.1722. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the following institutions to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with its systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program in aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the following amounts:

(1) The University of Texas at Arlington, $16 million;

(2) The University of Texas at Austin, $12.5 million;

(3) The University of Texas at Brownsville, $22.5 million;

(4) The University of Texas at Dallas, $5 million;

(5) The University of Texas at El Paso, $14 million;

(6) The University of Texas--Pan American, $17 million;

(7) The University of Texas of the Permian Basin, $25.8 million;

(8) The University of Texas at San Antonio, $50 million;

(9) The University of Texas at Tyler, $9.5 million;

(10) The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center, $20 million;

(11) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston, $17.5 million; and

(12) the Lower Rio Grande Valley Academic Health Center, $30 million, if that institution is established.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its constitutional and statutory duties and purposes.

(d) Of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section:

(1) for The University of Texas at San Antonio, $35 million may be used only to build or construct the university's downtown campus, phase III; and

(2) for The University of Texas at Tyler:

(A) $4 million may be used only for an upper-level educational center at Longview; and

(B) $500,000 may be used only for The University of Texas at Tyler, Nursing-Palestine Extension.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1844), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 55.1723. THE UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the following institutions to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed the following amounts:

(1) the University of Houston, $12 million;

(2) the University of Houston--Downtown, $7.5 million; and

(3) the University of Houston--Victoria, $10 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of Houston System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.1724. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM.

(a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the following institutions to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the following:

(1) Lamar University--Beaumont, $8 million;

(2) Lamar Institute of Technology, $2 million;

(3) Lamar State College--Orange, $3.5 million;

(4) Lamar State College--Port Arthur, $2.75 million;

(5) Sam Houston State University, $7.5 million;

(6) Texas State University, $19.7 million; and

(7) Sul Ross State University, $17.5 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 767, Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 3564), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (S.B. 974), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 55.1725. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS AND UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER AT FORT WORTH. (a) The board of regents of the University of North Texas may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the University of North Texas or the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in the aggregate principal amounts not to exceed $20 million for the University of North Texas and $19 million for the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of the University of North Texas or the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at the University of North Texas or the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds between the University of North Texas and the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for the University of North Texas and the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth to carry out their duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.1726. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) The board of regents of the Texas Woman's University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for a component institution of the system to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed $8.5 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of the Texas Woman's University System, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at a component institution of the system. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 27, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 55.1728. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY. (a) The board of regents of Stephen F. Austin State University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for Stephen F. Austin State University to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed $6 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Stephen F. Austin State University, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at Stephen F. Austin State University. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.173. THE UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the authority granted by Sections 55.13, 55.17, 55.171, 55.1715, and 55.19 of this code, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may acquire, purchase, construct, renovate, enlarge, and equip buildings, facilities, roads, land, and infrastructure for the University of Houston-Victoria.

(b) Beginning September 1, 1995, the board may issue bonds under this subchapter, in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $9 million to finance those items.

(c) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any of the aggregate amount of student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at the University of Houston-Victoria or at a component of the University of Houston System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(d) The board may repay the interest and principal on bonds issued under this section and maintenance and operations of the facility with appropriations that otherwise would have been for the lease of facilities.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 462, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 55.1731. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may issue in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board bonds for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts to finance projects specified as follows:

(1) Prairie View A&M University:

(A) $53 million to construct or renovate engineering facilities, construct and renovate an architecture building, and carry out other campus renovations; and

(B) $15 million to construct a juvenile justice and psychology building;

(2) Tarleton State University, $18.7 million for a library addition and renovation of a mathematics building;

(3) Texas A&M University--Commerce, $14,960,000 to construct a science building;

(4) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi, $34 million to construct a classroom and laboratory facility and for construction of the Harte Research Center;

(5) Texas A&M International University, $21,620,000 to construct a science building (Phase IV);

(6) Texas A&M University at Galveston, $10,030,000 to construct an engineering building;

(7) Texas A&M University--Kingsville, $20,060,000 to construct facilities for a pharmacy school and to construct a student services building;

(8) Texas A&M University--Texarkana, $17 million to construct a health science building and for library renovation;

(9) West Texas A&M University, $22,780,000 to construct a fine arts complex; and

(10) The Texas A&M University Health Science Center, $14.3 million for construction of classroom and faculty office facilities for the School of Rural Public Health.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects at an institution that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

(e) The bonds authorized by Subsection (a)(1)(B) for Prairie View A&M University may not be issued before March 1, 2003.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 14, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 55.1732. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may issue in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board bonds for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts to finance projects specified as follows:

(1) The University of Texas at Arlington, $16,635,945 to construct a science building;

(2) The University of Texas at Brownsville, $26,010,000 to construct a life and health science and education facility (Phase II) and to procure and install permanent equipment and other fixtures in the facility;

(3) The University of Texas at Dallas, $21,993,750 to renovate and develop space at the Founders Hall, Founders Annex, and Berkner Hall;

(4) The University of Texas at El Paso, $12,750,000 to construct a biomedical and health sciences research center;

(5) The University of Texas--Pan American, $29,950,000 for education complex, library, and multipurpose center renovation and construction;

(6) The University of Texas of the Permian Basin, $5,610,000 for integrated Mesa Building renovations and gymnasium renovations;

(7) The University of Texas at San Antonio, $22,950,000 to construct a science building on the main campus;

(8) The University of Texas at Tyler, $20,910,000 to construct an engineering, sciences, and technology building and make other physical plant improvements;

(9) The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center, $40 million for North Campus phase IV construction;

(10) The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston, $20 million to renovate and expand research facilities;

(11) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston, $19,550,000 to construct or purchase a classroom building that includes facilities for clinical teaching and clinical research;

(12) The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio, $28.9 million to construct a facility for student services and academic administration and to construct and develop a facility at the Laredo Extension Campus for educational and administrative purposes;

(13) the Regional Academic Health Center established under Section 74.611, $25.5 million to construct a teaching and learning laboratory in or near the city of Harlingen;

(14) The University of Texas Health Center at Tyler, $11,513,250 to construct a biomedical research center addition; and

(15) The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center, $20 million to construct a basic sciences research building.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects at an institution that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

(e) Bonds authorized or issued under this section for the regional academic health center established under Section 74.611 are considered to have been authorized or issued for The University of Texas Health Science Center--South Texas and its component institutions if the health science center is established.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 615, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 98), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1844), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 55.1733. THE UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may issue in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board bonds for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts to finance projects specified as follows:

(1) the University of Houston, $51 million to construct science and engineering research and classroom facilities;

(2) the University of Houston--Downtown, $18,232,500 to construct a classroom building;

(3) the University of Houston--Clear Lake, $30,918,750 to construct a student services and classroom building; and

(4) the University of Houston--Victoria, $2,805,000 to remodel the University West facility, acquire and renovate a facility services building, and renovate and expand a facility for the center for community initiatives.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of Houston System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects at an institution that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 55.1734. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS.

(a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State University System may issue in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board bonds for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts to finance projects specified as follows:

(1) Lamar University--Beaumont, $21,792,096 to renovate and repair campus buildings;

(2) Lamar Institute of Technology, $5,301,960 to renovate Gentry Hall and convert it to classroom and laboratory use;

(3) Lamar State College--Orange, $2,125,000 for campus landscaping, renovation of the old library for physical plant purposes, renovation of the Main Building and Electronics Commerce Resource Center, and demolition of the old physical plant building;

(4) Lamar State College--Port Arthur, $7,650,000 to construct a performing arts and classroom building and to expand the Gates Memorial Library and develop an adjacent plaza;

(5) Sam Houston State University, $18 million to renovate and expand the Farrington Building;

(6) Texas State University, $18,436,500 to construct a business building; and

(7) Sul Ross State University, $15,175,000 to renovate and expand the range animal science facility and science building annex and to carry out other building renovations.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects at an institution that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 3564), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (S.B. 974), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 55.1735. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of North Texas System may issue in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board bonds for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts to finance projects specified as follows:

(1) the University of North Texas, $52,933,750 to construct a science building and to develop the campus and facilities of the University of North Texas System Center at Dallas at the location to become the University of North Texas at Dallas; and

(2) the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, $27.5 million to construct a biotechnology center and school of public health building.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of the University of North Texas or the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds between the University of North Texas and the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for the University of North Texas and the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth to carry out their duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects at an institution that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

(e) The board may not issue bonds under Subsection (a)(1) for the University of North Texas at Dallas before September 1, 2003.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 940, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1319, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2003.

Sec. 55.1736. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Woman's University System may issue bonds in accordance with this subchapter in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed $25,797,500 to finance the renovation of academic and administrative buildings at a component institution of the system.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of the Texas Woman's University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at a component institution of the system.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 28, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 55.1738. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Stephen F. Austin State University may issue in accordance with this subchapter bonds not to exceed $14,070,000 to finance campus infrastructure improvements, the construction of a telecommunications building, the renovation of power plant facilities, and the replacement or renovation of the Birdwell Building at Stephen F. Austin State University.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Stephen F. Austin State University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 55.1739. TEXAS TECH UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may issue in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board bonds for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for projects specified as follows:

(1) Texas Tech University, $23,647,000 to construct an experimental science research facility; and

(2) Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, $66,882,525 to construct a clinical and research facility in the city of Lubbock and to construct facilities to support the center's educational programs in the city of El Paso.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Tech University or the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds between Texas Tech University and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for Texas Tech University and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center to carry out their duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects at an institution that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 55.17391. TEXAS SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Southern University may issue in accordance with this subchapter bonds not to exceed $79 million to finance the construction of a science building, the construction of a building for the school of public affairs, the renovation of campus facilities, including electrical and piping systems, and campus landscaping.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Southern University, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at the university. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

(d) Of the bonds authorized by Subsection (a), $14.5 million may not be issued before March 1, 2003, and may be used only to finance campus renovations.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 55.17392. TEXAS STATE TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM. (a) The board of regents of the Texas State Technical College System may issue in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board bonds for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for projects specified as follows:

(1) Texas State Technical College--Harlingen, $3.4 million to construct a facility for a learning resource center and distance learning center;

(2) Texas State Technical College--Marshall, $1,785,000 to construct a facility for a library and administrative activities;

(3) Texas State Technical College--Waco, $3.4 million to renovate the industrial technology center; and

(4) Texas State Technical College--West Texas, $2,295,000 to construct a transportation technologies building.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State Technical College System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State Technical College System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects at an institution that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1432, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 55.174. TEXAS SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY. (a) In addition to other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Southern University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for Texas Southern University to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a revenue financing program adopted by the board in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $18 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Southern University, including student tuition charges required or authorized by law to be imposed on students enrolled at the university. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 748, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.1741. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL REVENUE BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities to support kinesiology and related programs, campus utility infrastructure facilities, and campus support services facilities (phase V), including roads and related infrastructure, for Texas A&M International University, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $12.5 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of the bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 615, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 55.17411. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL REVENUE BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, or other facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center to develop a biosciences research center in the City of Temple, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $15 million.

(b) The board of regents may pledge irrevocably to the payment of the bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board of regents to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) If the Temple Health and Bioscience Economic Development District is established, the district is responsible for the payment of debt service on the bonds authorized by this section for any facilities financed by the bonds that are located in the district and used to support the purposes or programs of the district.

(e) The legislature may not appropriate general revenue to pay, or to reimburse the board of regents or Texas A&M University for the payment of, debt service on bonds authorized by this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 55.1741 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(19), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 55.1742. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL REVENUE BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston for recovery from the damage caused by Tropical Storm Allison, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $34.9 million.

(b) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center for biotechnology research and development facilities, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with its systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $20 million.

(c) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, or other facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center, to be used primarily to conduct biomedical research and to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $56 million.

(d) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, or other facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston for the replacement of research and academic facilities lost in Tropical Storm Allison, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $30 million.

(e) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of the bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(f) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(g) The board may not issue bonds authorized by Subsection (c) at a time that would require the payment of any debt service on the bonds before September 1, 2004.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 615, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1844), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 55.1743. THE UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the University of Houston System, including the individual campuses of the system, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $25 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of Houston System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 615, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 55.1744. SOUTHWEST TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State University System may issue bonds in accordance with this subchapter in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed $27 million to finance the acquisition, purchase, construction, improvement, renovation, enlargement, or equipping of property, buildings, structures, facilities, or related infrastructure for a multi-institutional education center in Williamson County for Southwest Texas State University to offer educational programs and supporting activities and provide facilities for other educational entities to further institutional efficiency and coordinate educational programs.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Southwest Texas State University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 940, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1319, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2003.

Sec. 55.1749. TEXAS TECH UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL REVENUE BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, or other facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center for an academic building to support the center's educational programs in the city of El Paso, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $45 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of the bonds authorized by Subsection (a) all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Tech University or the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds between Texas Tech University and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for Texas Tech University and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center to carry out their duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section that is not required for the academic building described by Subsection (a) may be used by the Texas Tech University System to renovate existing structures and facilities of the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 10.01, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Sec. 55.17491. TEXAS SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY; TROPICAL STORM ALLISON. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Southern University may restore facilities and related infrastructure at Texas Southern University damaged by Tropical Storm Allison, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $3,510,000.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Southern University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 11.01, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Sec. 55.1751. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions and facilities not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified as follows:

(1) Tarleton State University:

(A) $11,124,000 for the Tarleton State University Dairy Center; and

(B) $24,300,000 for a nursing building;

(2) Texas A&M University--Central Texas, $25 million for educational and related facilities;

(3) Texas A&M University--Commerce, $21,770,000 for a music building;

(4) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi, $45 million for a nursing, health sciences, and kinesiology facility;

(5) Texas A&M University--Kingsville, $9,540,000 for the citrus center building;

(6) Texas A&M University--San Antonio, $40 million for educational and related facilities;

(7) Texas A&M University--Texarkana, $75 million for a multipurpose library building and central plant;

(8) West Texas A&M University, $16,200,000 for classroom center renovation;

(9) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center, $45 million for a medical education and research building in College Station, Texas;

(10) Texas A&M University, $75 million for the Emerging Technologies Interdisciplinary Building;

(11) Texas A&M University at Galveston, $40,050,000 for a science building; and

(12) Texas A&M International University:

(A) $25 million for the student success center;

(B) $4,950,000 for the completion of the fine arts theater; and

(C) $7,626,600 for the Loop Road and Chill Water Loop project.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Text of subsection as repealed effective May 23, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129 (S.B. 629), Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), The Texas A&M University System may not issue bonds under this section for facilities at Texas A&M University--Central Texas until the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at Texas A&M University--Central Texas has reached an enrollment equivalent of 1,500 full-time students for one semester. If that enrollment is not reached by January 1, 2010, the system's authority to issue bonds for Texas A&M University--Central Texas under this section expires on that date.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), The Texas A&M University System may not issue bonds under this section for facilities at Texas A&M University--San Antonio until the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at Texas A&M University--San Antonio has reached an enrollment equivalent of 1,500 full-time students for one semester. If that enrollment is not reached by January 1, 2010, the system's authority to issue bonds for Texas A&M University--San Antonio under this section expires on that date.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Subsection (d) contingently repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129, Sec. 3(1), eff. May 23, 2009.

Subsection (e) contingently repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129, Sec. 3(1), eff. May 23, 2009.

Sec. 55.1752. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified as follows:

(1) The University of Texas at Arlington, $70,430,000 for an Engineering Research Building;

(2) The University of Texas at Austin, $105 million for the renovation of the Experimental Science Building;

(3) The University of Texas at Brownsville, $33,800,000 for a Science and Technology Learning Center;

(4) The University of Texas at Dallas, $12 million for a vivarium and experimental space;

(5) The University of Texas at El Paso, $76,500,000 for a physical sciences/engineering core facility;

(6) The University of Texas--Pan American:

(A) $6 million for the Starr County Upper Level Center; and

(B) $39,796,000 for the fine arts academic and performance complex;

(7) The University of Texas of the Permian Basin:

(A) $54 million for a science and technology complex; and

(B) $45 million for an arts convocation and classroom facility at the CEED;

(8) The University of Texas at San Antonio, $74,250,000 for an engineering building (phase II);

(9) The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center, $42 million for the north campus (phase 5);

(10) The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston, $57 million for the Galveston National Laboratory;

(11) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston, $60 million for a replacement building for The University of Texas Dental Branch at Houston;

(12) The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio, $60 million for the South Texas Research Facility;

(13) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler, $21,120,000 for an academic health center;

(14) The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center, $40 million for a Center for Targeted Therapy research building; and

(15) The University of Texas at Tyler:

(A) $6,300,000 for the expansion of the Palestine campus; and

(B) $43,200,000 for the completion, renovation, and expansion of engineering and sciences facilities.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1844), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 55.17521. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT DALLAS: LIMITATIONS ON CERTAIN DEBT SERVICE REIMBURSEMENT. The state may not appropriate money to reimburse The University of Texas System for debt service on long-term obligations related to the construction of a natural science and engineering research building at The University of Texas at Dallas in accordance with the economic development agreement entered into between this state and the board of regents of the system in excess of the following amounts:

(1) for a state fiscal year before the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2018, $6,540,600;

(2) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2018, $6,213,570;

(3) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2019, $5,559,510;

(4) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2020, $4,905,450;

(5) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2021, $4,251,390;

(6) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2022, $3,597,330;

(7) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2023, $2,616,240;

(8) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2024, or August 31, 2025, $1,308,120; and

(9) for the state fiscal year ending August 31, 2026, or August 31, 2027, $654,060.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 2, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 55.1753. UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for the following institutions, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board, in aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the following:

(1) the University of Houston, $57,600,000 for renovation of science laboratories;

(2) the University of Houston--Clear Lake, $10,604,808 for Arbor Building renovations and additions;

(3) the University of Houston--Downtown, $31,626,000 for a classroom building at Shea Street; and

(4) the University of Houston--Victoria:

(A) $22,900,000 for an academic building at the University of Houston System Center at Sugar Land;

(B) $6,719,400 for regional economic development; and

(C) $1,800,000 for allied health facilities.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of Houston System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 55.1754. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified as follows:

(1) Lamar University, $4,500,000 for renovations and additions to the Lucas Engineering Building;

(2) Lamar State College--Orange, $1,837,280 for Hibernia Bank Building acquisition and renovation;

(3) Lamar State College--Port Arthur, $1,849,500 for a computer/learning center;

(4) Texas State University:

(A) $42,700,000 for an undergraduate academic center; and

(B) $36 million for facilities for the Round Rock Higher Education Center in Williamson County (phase II); and

(5) Sam Houston State University, $10 million for the construction of a center for the performing arts (phase I).

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (S.B. 974), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 55.1755. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of North Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions and facilities not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified as follows:

(1) the University of North Texas, $50 million for the construction of a College of Business Administration building;

(2) the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, $41,972,400 for campus expansion and construction of a public health education building; and

(3) the University of North Texas Dallas Campus, $25 million for a general academic building.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of North Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of North Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Text of subsection as repealed effective May 23, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129 (S.B. 629), Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the University of North Texas System may not issue bonds under this section for facilities at the University of North Texas Dallas Campus until the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at the University of North Texas Dallas Campus has reached an enrollment equivalent of 1,500 full-time students for one semester. If that enrollment is not reached by January 1, 2010, the system's authority to issue bonds for the University of North Texas Dallas Campus under this section expires on that date.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Subsection (d) contingently repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129, Sec. 3(2), eff. May 23, 2009.

Sec. 55.1756. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Woman's University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for renovations and additions to the science building on the Denton campus of Texas Woman's University, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $21,739,712.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of the Texas Woman's University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 29, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 55.1758. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Stephen F. Austin State University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects at Stephen F. Austin State University, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified as follows:

(1) $20,178,000 for an education research facility; and

(2) $10 million for a campus deferred maintenance reduction plan.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Stephen F. Austin State University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 55.1759. TEXAS TECH UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified as follows:

(1) Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center:

(A) $8,010,000 for the School of Pharmacy expansion in Amarillo;

(B) $18 million for the Amarillo research facility; and

(C) $6,300,000 for the El Paso Medical Science Building renovation; and

(2) Texas Tech University:

(A) $25 million for the renovation of a classroom building;

(B) $25 million for the Rawls College of Business Administration building; and

(C) $7,500,000 for a law school trial advocacy/education center.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas Tech University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas Tech University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 55.17591. TEXAS SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Southern University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects at Texas Southern University, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified as follows:

(1) $31,500,000 for the School of Science and Technology; and

(2) $15 million for a branch campus multipurpose Academic Center (MAC).

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Southern University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the board of regents of Texas Southern University may not issue bonds under this section for a branch campus multipurpose Academic Center (MAC) until the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board grants Texas Southern University the approval to operate the branch campus. If approval to operate the branch campus is not granted by January 1, 2010, the board of regents' authority to issue bonds for a multipurpose Academic Center (MAC) under this section expires on that date.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 55.17592. TEXAS STATE TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State Technical College System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure, for HVAC replacement at Texas State Technical College--Waco, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $3,125,520.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State Technical College System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State Technical College System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (H.B. 153), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 55.1768. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted under this subchapter, the board of regents of Stephen F. Austin State University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for the expansion of the school of nursing facilities at Stephen F. Austin State University, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $13 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of the bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Stephen F. Austin State University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section that is not required for the specified project for which the bonds are authorized may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the institution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1207 (H.B. 1775), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 55.1769. ANGELO STATE UNIVERSITY. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may issue bonds, in accordance with this subchapter and with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board, in the aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the amounts previously authorized for Angelo State University by Sections 55.1724 and 55.1734, as those sections existed immediately before this section took effect, less any portion of those amounts for which bonds were issued under those sections for the university before the date this section took effect. Subject to Subsection (d), bonds issued under this section for an amount previously authorized by Section 55.1724 or 55.1734 may be used only at Angelo State University for the purposes for which the bonds for Angelo State University were authorized to be issued under Section 55.1724 or 55.1734, as applicable.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas Tech University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas Tech University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the university.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 3564), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 55.1771. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY AT GALVESTON. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter and subject to the other provisions of this section, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for Texas A&M University at Galveston for an erosion control breakwater, a dock, or any other related purpose reasonably necessary to assist the institution to recover from any damage or other impact caused by Hurricane Ike, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $5 million.

(b) The board of regents may pledge irrevocably to the payment of the bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board of regents to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 287 (H.B. 51), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 55.17721. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS MEDICAL BRANCH AT GALVESTON. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter and subject to the other provisions of this section, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property, buildings, structures, facilities, roads, or related infrastructure for The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston for any purpose reasonably necessary to assist the institution to recover from any damage or other impact caused by Hurricane Ike, to be financed by the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, including bonds issued in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program and secured as provided by that program, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $150 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of the bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 , Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 , Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 287 (H.B. 51), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.1781. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) Texas A&M University--Commerce, $48 million for construction of a nursing and health sciences building;

(2) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi, $60 million for construction of a life sciences research and engineering building;

(3) Texas A&M University--Kingsville, $60 million for an educational complex;

(4) Texas A&M University--Texarkana, $32 million for construction of an academic and student services building;

(5) West Texas A&M University:

(A) $38,160,000 for construction of an agricultural sciences complex; and

(B) $7,200,000 for renovation of the Amarillo Center;

(6) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center:

(A) $72 million for construction of a dental clinic facility at the Baylor College of Dentistry; and

(B) $72 million for construction of a multidisciplinary research and education facility in Bryan, Texas;

(7) Texas A&M International University, $55,200,000 for library renovation through the addition of instructional and support spaces;

(8) Prairie View A&M University, $28,632,000 for construction of a fabrication center and capital improvements;

(9) Tarleton State University:

(A) $54 million for construction of an applied sciences building; and

(B) $39,600,000 for construction of a southwest metroplex building in Tarrant County;

(10) Texas A&M University, $75 million for construction of a biocontainment research facility;

(11) Texas A&M University at Galveston, $60 million for construction of a classroom and laboratory facility and campus infrastructure;

(12) Texas A&M University--Central Texas, $36 million for construction of a multipurpose building; and

(13) Texas A&M University--San Antonio, $63 million for construction of a science and technology building and campus infrastructure.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.1782. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) The University of Texas at Austin, $75 million for renovation of Robert A. Welch Hall;

(2) The University of Texas--Rio Grande Valley:

(A) $36,432,000 for construction of a multipurpose academic building at the campus in Brownsville; and

(B) $30,600,000 for construction of an interdisciplinary engineering academic studies building at the campus in Edinburg;

(3) The University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center at Dallas, $80 million for the construction and renovation of a vivarium and academic and laboratory facilities;

(4) The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio, $80 million for facility renewal and renovation;

(5) The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center, $70 million for construction of the Sheikh Zayed Bin Sultan Al Nahyan building;

(6) The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston, $67,800,000 for construction of a health education center;

(7) The University of Texas at Arlington, $70 million for construction of a science and education innovation and research building;

(8) The University of Texas at Dallas, $70 million for construction of an engineering building;

(9) The University of Texas at El Paso, $70 million for construction of an interdisciplinary research facility;

(10) The University of Texas at San Antonio, $70 million for construction of an instructional science and engineering building;

(11) The University of Texas at Tyler, $60 million for construction of a STEM building;

(12) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston, $80 million for the renovation and modernization of educational and research facilities;

(13) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler, $14,800,000 for the renovation and modernization of educational and research facilities; and

(14) The University of Texas of the Permian Basin, $48 million for construction of engineering and kinesiology buildings.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.1783. UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions or entities, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) the University of Houston:

(A) $63 million for construction of a health and biomedical sciences center; and

(B) $54 million for construction of a new academic building located in Sugar Land, Texas;

(2) the University of Houston--Clear Lake:

(A) $24,624,000 for construction of a health sciences and classroom building located in Pearland, Texas; and

(B) $54 million for construction of a STEM and classroom building;

(3) the University of Houston--Downtown, $60 million for construction of a science and technology building;

(4) the University of Houston--Victoria, $60 million for academic expansion and land acquisition; and

(5) the University of Houston System, $46,832,000 for land acquisition for construction of a building in the area near Katy, Texas.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of Houston System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.1784. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) Lamar University, $60 million for construction of a science building;

(2) Lamar State College--Orange, $10 million for construction of a multipurpose education building;

(3) Lamar State College--Port Arthur, $8,080,000 for expansion of technology program facilities;

(4) Lamar Institute of Technology, $12,500,000 for construction and renovation of technical arts buildings;

(5) Texas State University:

(A) $63 million for construction of an engineering and sciences building; and

(B) $48,600,000 for construction of a health professions building in Round Rock, Texas;

(6) Sam Houston State University, $48 million for construction of a biology laboratory building; and

(7) Sul Ross State University, $6,240,000 for renovation and modernization of educational and related facilities and infrastructure.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.1785. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of North Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions or entities, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) the University of North Texas System, $56 million for renovation of college of law buildings;

(2) the University of North Texas, $70 million for construction and renovation of college of visual arts and design facilities;

(3) the University of North Texas at Dallas, $63 million for construction of a student learning and success center; and

(4) the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, $80 million for construction of an interdisciplinary research building.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of North Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of North Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.1786. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Woman's University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for a laboratory building, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, not to exceed the aggregate principal amount of $37,997,000.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of the Texas Woman's University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 145 (S.B. 1126), Sec. 30, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 55.1788. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Stephen F. Austin State University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics research building at Stephen F. Austin State University, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, not to exceed the aggregate principal amount of $46,400,000.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Stephen F. Austin State University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.1789. TEXAS TECH UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center:

(A) $60,264,000 for construction of Lubbock education, research, and technology facilities;

(B) $14,256,000 for construction of the Permian Basin academic facility; and

(C) $5,715,000 for construction of the Amarillo Panhandle Clinical/Hospital Simulation;

(2) Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center at El Paso, $75,520,000 for construction of the El Paso Medical Science Building II;

(3) Texas Tech University, $70 million for construction of an experimental sciences high tech interdisciplinary research building; and

(4) Angelo State University, $21,360,000 for construction of a College of Health and Human Services building.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas Tech University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas Tech University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.17891. TEXAS SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Southern University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for the Robert J. Terry Library at Texas Southern University, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, not to exceed the aggregate principal amount of $60 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Southern University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.17892. TEXAS STATE TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State Technical College System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) Texas State Technical College--West Texas, $12 million for construction of an industrial technology center;

(2) Texas State Technical College--Harlingen, $3,750,000 for Phase II of the Engineering Technology Center renovation;

(3) Texas State Technical College--Waco, $14,950,000 for construction of the Fort Bend Campus Building #2; and

(4) Texas State Technical College--Marshall, $11,040,000 for purchase and renovation of the North Texas Technology Center.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State Technical College System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State Technical College System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 55.17893. MIDWESTERN STATE UNIVERSITY. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may issue bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board in the aggregate principal amounts not to exceed the amounts previously authorized for Midwestern State University by Sections 55.1727, 55.1737, 55.1757, and 55.1787, as those sections existed immediately before this section took effect, less any portion of those amounts for which bonds were issued under those sections for the university before the date this section took effect. Subject to Subsection (d), bonds issued under this section for an amount previously authorized by Section 55.1727, 55.1737, 55.1757, or 55.1787 may be used only at Midwestern State University for the purposes for which the bonds were authorized to be issued for the university under Section 55.1727, 55.1737, 55.1757, or 55.1787, as applicable.

(b) The board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may pledge irrevocably to the payment of those bonds all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas Tech University System. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas Tech University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) Any portion of the proceeds of bonds authorized by this section for one or more specified projects that is not required for the specified projects may be used to renovate existing structures and facilities at the university.

(e) The board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may issue refunding bonds under Chapter 1207, Government Code, to refund all or any part of the outstanding bonds, notes, or other general or special obligations issued by or for the benefit of Midwestern State University, including obligations previously issued by the Texas Public Finance Authority. For purposes of Chapter 1207, Government Code, and in connection with the issuance of any refunding bonds under that chapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System shall be considered the issuer of the outstanding bonds, notes, or obligations of Midwestern State University which are being refunded.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 417 (H.B. 1522), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 55.1791. THE TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) The Texas A&M University System, $43,425,406 for construction of a STEM education center at the RELLIS campus;

(2) Prairie View A&M University, $44,922,833 for construction of a teaching and academic student support services facility;

(3) Tarleton State University:

(A) $65 million for construction of a College of Health Sciences and Human Services building on the Stephenville campus; and

(B) $25 million for expansion of the Fort Worth campus;

(4) Texas A&M University, $56,153,542 for construction of a clinical veterinary teaching and research complex;

(5) Texas A&M University--Commerce, $44,922,833 for an Agricultural Multipurpose Education and Training Center;

(6) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi, $44,922,833 for construction of an arts and media building;

(7) Texas A&M University at Galveston, $33,692,125 for construction of an engineering classroom and research building;

(8) Texas A&M University--Kingsville, $44,922,833 for renovations to address deferred maintenance for campus buildings;

(9) Texas A&M University--Central Texas, $44,922,833 for construction of a central utility plant and infrastructure upgrades;

(10) West Texas A&M University, $44,922,833 for infrastructure upgrades to address health and safety issues and the renovation of an education building;

(11) Texas A&M University--San Antonio, $44,922,833 for construction of a public health and education building;

(12) Texas A&M International University, $44,922,833 for construction of a health science education and research center;

(13) Texas A&M University--Texarkana, $44,922,833 for construction of a business, engineering, and technology building; and

(14) The Texas A&M University System Health Science Center:

(A) $69,897,111 for construction of the Texas Medical Center Building 3 in Houston, Texas; and

(B) $29,948,556 for construction of a nursing education and research center in McAllen, Texas.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The Texas A&M University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The Texas A&M University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for an institution of higher education, entity, or university system, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the same institution, entity, or system in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the institution, entity, or system under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(e) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (d) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1792. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of The University of Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) The University of Texas System, $56,153,542 for renovation of the Microelectronics Research Center at the J. J. Pickle Research Campus;

(2) The University of Texas at Arlington, $52,409,972 for renovation of the Life Science Building;

(3) The University of Texas at Austin, $56,153,542 for renovation of the Physics, Math, and Astronomy Building;

(4) The University of Texas at Dallas, $52,409,972 for construction of a student success center;

(5) The University of Texas at El Paso, $52,409,972 for construction of an advanced teaching and learning complex;

(6) The University of Texas of the Permian Basin, $44,922,833 for renovation of the Mesa Building and campus transformation;

(7) The University of Texas Rio Grande Valley, $44,922,833 for construction of a health affairs building;

(8) The University of Texas at San Antonio, $52,409,972 for construction of an Innovation, Entrepreneurship, and Careers building;

(9) The University of Texas at Tyler, $44,922,833 for construction of a sciences building;

(10) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston, $69,897,111 for construction of a public health education and research building;

(11) The University of Texas Health Science Center at San Antonio, $59,897,111 for construction of the Glenn Biggs Institute for Alzheimer's & Neurodegenerative Diseases Building;

(12) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Tyler:

(A) $48 million for construction of a health professions education center; and

(B) $10 million for construction of a health professions education center located in Longview, Texas;

(13) The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center, $69,897,111 for construction of a life sciences research, innovation, and discovery initiative facility;

(14) The University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston, $59,897,111 for infrastructure and research space upgrades for research buildings; and

(15) UT Southwestern Medical Center, $59,897,111 for construction of the north campus Phase VI Brain Institute shell space.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of The University of Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of The University of Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for an institution of higher education, entity, or university system, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the same institution, entity, or system in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the institution, entity, or system under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(e) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (d) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1793. UNIVERSITY OF HOUSTON SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of Houston System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) the University of Houston System, $59,897,111 for construction of a medical research facility;

(2) the University of Houston:

(A) $40 million for construction of the Hobby School of Public Affairs Building;

(B) $52,409,972 for construction of the IDEA Lab; and

(C) $52,409,972 for construction of the Sugar Land Academic Building 2;

(3) the University of Houston--Clear Lake, $44,922,833 for renovation of the Bayou Building, the Delta Building, and the Student Services and Classroom Building;

(4) the University of Houston--Downtown, $44,922,833 for renovation of existing buildings and other campus infrastructure upgrades and for the construction of the Police Department and Criminal Justice Academy Building; and

(5) the University of Houston--Victoria, $44,922,833 for renovation of existing buildings and other campus infrastructure upgrades.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of Houston System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of Houston System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for an institution of higher education, entity, or university system, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the same institution, entity, or system in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the institution, entity, or system under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(e) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (d) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1794. TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) Texas State University System, $11,230,708 for construction of a field research station and dam repair;

(2) Lamar State College--Orange, $37,435,695 for the replacement of an academic building to house general academic instruction and information technology services;

(3) Lamar State College--Port Arthur, $37,435,695 for construction of an allied health and sciences building;

(4) Lamar Institute of Technology, $37,435,695 for construction of a facility for workforce and allied health programs;

(5) Lamar University, $44,922,833 for renovation of a library;

(6) Sam Houston State University:

(A) $44,922,833 for construction of an allied health building located in Conroe, Texas; and

(B) $44,922,833 for construction of an active learning center located in Huntsville, Texas; and

(7) Texas State University:

(A) $111,921,496 for construction of a STEM classroom building located in San Marcos, Texas; and

(B) $52,409,972 for construction of a health professions building located in Round Rock, Texas.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for an institution of higher education, entity, or university system the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the same institution, entity, or system in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the institution, entity, or system under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(e) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (d) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1795. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the University of North Texas System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) the University of North Texas, $113,400,000 for construction of a science and technology research building;

(2) the University of North Texas at Dallas, $100,000,000 for construction of a science building; and

(3) the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth, $59,897,111 for campus space optimization and realignment.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the University of North Texas System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the University of North Texas System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for an institution of higher education, entity, or university system, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the same institution, entity, or system in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the institution, entity, or system under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(e) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (d) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1796. TEXAS WOMAN'S UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Woman's University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for a health sciences center, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, not to exceed the aggregate principal amount of $100 million.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Woman's University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for Texas Woman's University, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the university in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the university under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(d) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (c) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1797. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Stephen F. Austin State University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for construction of an interdisciplinary and applied sciences building, to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, not to exceed the aggregate principal amount of $44,922,833.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Stephen F. Austin State University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for Stephen F. Austin State University, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the university in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the university under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(d) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (c) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1798. TEXAS TECH UNIVERSITY SYSTEM; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas Tech University System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter and in accordance with a systemwide revenue financing program adopted by the board for the following institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) Angelo State University, $36 million for a central plant maintenance and renovation;

(2) Texas Tech University:

(A) $72 million for renovations to address deferred maintenance for campus buildings; and

(B) $8 million for maintenance and program enhancement construction in Junction, Texas;

(3) Midwestern State University, $44,922,833 for renovations to an existing building and other campus infrastructure upgrades;

(4) Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center:

(A) $59,897,111 for maintenance and renovation of an existing facility; and

(B) $18,717,847 for construction and equipment of the physician assistant facility in Midland, Texas; and

(5) Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center at El Paso, $59,897,111 for construction of a dental school building.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas Tech University System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas Tech University System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for an institution of higher education, entity, or university system, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the same institution, entity, or system in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the institution, entity, or system under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(e) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (d) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.1799. TEXAS SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY; ADDITIONAL BONDS. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of Texas Southern University may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) $22,800,000 for renovation of the Nabrit Building;

(2) $2,400,000 for upgrades to signage and wayfinding;

(3) $40 million for facility maintenance and renovation; and

(4) $30 million for construction of a health and wellness center.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of Texas Southern University, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for Texas Southern University, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the university in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the university under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(d) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (c) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.17991. TEXAS STATE TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM. (a) In addition to the other authority granted by this subchapter, the board of regents of the Texas State Technical College System may acquire, purchase, construct, improve, renovate, enlarge, or equip property and facilities, including roads and related infrastructure, for projects to be financed through the issuance of bonds in accordance with this subchapter for the following entity and institutions, not to exceed the following aggregate principal amounts for the projects specified, as follows:

(1) Texas State Technical College System, $33,300,000 for the East Williamson County Higher Education Center expansion;

(2) Texas State Technical College--Fort Bend, $41,800,000 for Fort Bend County campus expansion;

(3) Texas State Technical College--Harlingen, $37,800,000 for Harlingen campus expansion;

(4) Texas State Technical College--Marshall, $15 million for Marshall campus expansion;

(5) Texas State Technical College--North Texas, $13.5 million for North Texas campus expansion;

(6) Texas State Technical College--West Texas, $13.5 million for West Texas campus expansion; and

(7) Texas State Technical College--Waco, $53,600,000 for Waco campus expansion.

(b) The board may pledge irrevocably to the payment of bonds authorized by this section all or any part of the revenue funds of an institution, branch, or entity of the Texas State Technical College System, including student tuition charges. The amount of a pledge made under this subsection may not be reduced or abrogated while the bonds for which the pledge is made, or bonds issued to refund those bonds, are outstanding.

(c) If sufficient funds are not available to the board to meet its obligations under this section, the board may transfer funds among institutions, branches, and entities of the Texas State Technical College System to ensure the most equitable and efficient allocation of available resources for each institution, branch, or entity to carry out its duties and purposes.

(d) In lieu of financing a project described by Subsection (a) for an institution of higher education, entity, or system, the board may finance in the manner prescribed by that subsection an alternative project for deferred maintenance, infrastructure, or construction at the same institution, entity, or system in an amount not to exceed the total of the amount authorized for the project and any unspent amount from projects authorized for the institution, entity, or system under this chapter. The board shall notify the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board of an alternative project financed as provided by this subsection.

(e) For financing of an alternative project as provided by Subsection (d) in an amount that exceeds $25 million, the board must receive prior written approval from the governor and Legislative Budget Board. A request for approval of financing of an alternative project is considered approved unless the governor or the Legislative Budget Board issues a written disapproval not later than the 30th business day after the date of the receipt of the request.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 52), Sec. 2, eff. January 18, 2022.

Sec. 55.18. BONDS NOT OBLIGATIONS OF THE STATE. Bonds issued by a board are payable solely from the revenues, income, receipts, or other resources of the board, as provided in this subchapter, and such bonds shall never be an obligation of the State of Texas.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.19. REFUNDING BONDS. Any bonds or notes at any time issued by a board may be refunded or otherwise refinanced by the issuance by the board of refunding bonds for such purpose, under such terms, conditions, and details as may be determined by resolution of the board. All pertinent and appropriate provisions of this subchapter shall be applicable to such refunding bonds, and they shall be issued in the manner provided herein for other bonds authorized under this subchapter; provided that such refunding bonds may be sold and delivered in amounts necessary to pay the principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of bonds or notes to be funded or refunded, at maturity or on any redemption date. Also, such refunding bonds may be issued to be exchanged for the bonds or notes being refunded thereby. In the latter case, the Comptroller of Public Accounts of the State of Texas shall register the refunding bonds and deliver the same to the holder or holders of the bonds or notes being refunded thereby, in accordance with the provisions of the resolution authorizing the refunding bonds; and any such exchange may be made in one delivery, or in several installment deliveries. Bonds issued at any time by a board also may be refunded in the manner provided by any other applicable law.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.20. APPROVAL AND REGISTRATION OF BONDS. All bonds issued by any board, and the appropriate proceedings authorizing their issuance, shall be submitted to the Attorney General of the State of Texas for examination. If he finds that such bonds have been authorized in accordance with law he shall approve them, and thereupon they shall be registered by the comptroller; and after such approval and registration such bonds shall be incontestable in any court, or other forum, for any reason, and shall be valid and binding obligations in accordance with their terms for all purposes.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.21. BONDS ARE AUTHORIZED INVESTMENTS AND SECURITY FOR DEPOSITS. All bonds issued by any board are legal and authorized investments for all banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies of all kinds and types, fiduciaries, trustees, and guardians, and for all interest and sinking funds and other public funds of the State of Texas, and for all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and for all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic. Said bonds also shall be eligible and lawful security for all deposits of public funds of the State of Texas and all agencies, subdivisions, and instrumentalities thereof, including all counties, cities, towns, villages, school districts, and all other kinds and types of districts, public agencies, and bodies politic, to the extent of the market value of said bonds, when accompanied by any unmatured interest coupons appurtenant thereto.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.22. VALIDATION OF BONDS AND PROCEEDINGS. All revenue bonds heretofore approved by the attorney general and registered by the comptroller, which were issued, sold, and delivered by any board, and which are payable from or secured by a pledge of any revenues, income, receipts, or other resources of such board, are hereby validated in all respects, together with all proceedings authorizing the issuance thereof, and said bonds and proceedings are and shall be valid and binding obligations in accordance with their terms and conditions for all purposes, as though they had been duly and legally issued and authorized originally.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.23. CUMULATIVE EFFECT OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter shall be cumulative of all other law on the subject, but this subchapter shall be wholly sufficient authority within itself for the issuance of the bonds and the performance of the other acts and procedures authorized hereby, without reference to any other law or any restrictions or limitations contained therein, except as herein specifically provided; and when any bonds are being issued under this subchapter, then to the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between any provisions of this subchapter and any provision of any other law, the provisions of this subchapter shall prevail and control; provided, however, that any board shall have the right to use the provisions of any other laws, not in conflict with the provisions hereof, to the extent convenient or necessary to carry out any power or authority, express or implied, granted by this subchapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 55.24. PLEDGES UNDER PREVIOUS LAWS TO REMAIN IN EFFECT. (a) Where any revenues, income, receipts, or other resources of any board have been pledged to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or notes issued and delivered pursuant to any other law, the repeal of such law by virtue of the enactment of Title 3 of this code shall not affect any such pledge or any covenants with respect to such bonds or notes, or any bonds issued to refund same, and all such pledges and covenants shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with the terms and provisions thereof.

(b) Where all or any part of the revenue funds of any board have been pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds or notes or any other obligation issued or entered into and delivered pursuant to any provision of this title or any other law, the repeal or amendment of any provision of this title shall not affect any such pledge or any covenants with respect to such bonds, notes, or obligations or any bonds or notes issued to refund same, and all such pledges and covenants shall remain in full force and effect in accordance with the terms and provisions thereof.

(c) In furtherance of the provisions of Subsection (b) and in recognition that certain boards have outstanding bonds, notes, and other obligations secured by various liens on the tuition or a portion of the tuition charged and collected at certain institutions and that the provisions of Chapter 54 would make it difficult or impossible to identify and secure that portion of the revised tuition charges pledged to the payment of such bonds, notes, and obligations, net tuition, as defined in Section 51.009(c) and classified as educational and general funds by such provision, shall be set aside and utilized first to satisfy the obligations of each board secured by tuition in the order of priority of the liens on such funds. It is further provided for the benefit of the owners of such bonds and notes and the counterparties to such obligations of the boards that the charges per semester credit hour or for each semester or summer session, as the case may be, for tuition constituting the educational and general funds portion of tuition shall never be less than the amount charged for the 1996-1997 academic year.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1073, Sec. 2.03, eff. Aug. 1, 1997.

Sec. 55.25. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW; CONFLICTS. Chapters 1201, 1202, 1204, and 1371, Government Code, apply to all bonds issued pursuant to this chapter; provided, however, that in the event of any conflict between such laws and this chapter, the provisions of this chapter prevail.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1073, Sec. 2.04, eff. Aug. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.220, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER C. REFUNDING CONSTITUTIONAL BONDS AND NOTES

Sec. 55.41. REFUNDING BONDS. The governing board of any institution which has heretofore issued or which hereafter issues bonds or notes pursuant to the authority of Article VII, Section 17, of the Texas Constitution, as amended, may issue refunding bonds to refinance or refund any or all of the bonds or notes by the issuance of its refunding bonds; and the governing board may pledge all or any part of the funds allotted pursuant to that section of the constitution to any institution governed by the board to secure the refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section. The refunding bonds shall be issued in the amounts, and bear interest at the rates, determined by the governing board, provided that such interest rates shall not exceed any constitutional limit; and shall mature serially or otherwise in not more than 10 years. The refunding bonds shall be examined and approved by the attorney general, and when so approved shall be incontestable, and all bonds shall be registered by the comptroller of public accounts. The refunding bonds may be exchanged for bonds or notes issued pursuant to the section of the constitution or may be sold and the proceeds used to call and redeem the outstanding bonds and notes.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3072, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.